Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Part 3. Receipts Normally Apportioned
§ 3364.
Derivatives and options.

As used in this section, “derivative” means a contract or financial instrument or a combination of contracts and financial instruments which gives a trust the right or obligation to participate in some or all changes in the price of a tangible or intangible asset or group of assets, or changes in a rate, an index of prices or rates, or other market indicator for an asset or a group of assets.

To the extent that a trustee does not account under section 3353 of this title for transactions in derivatives, the trustee shall allocate to principal receipts from and disbursements made in connection with those transactions.

If a trustee grants an option to buy property from the trust, whether or not the trust owns the property when the option is granted, grants an option that permits another person to sell property to the trust, or acquires an option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an asset owned by the trust, and the trustee or other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the option is exercised, an amount received for granting the option must be allocated to principal. An amount paid to acquire the option must be paid from principal. A gain or loss realized upon the exercise of an option, including an option granted to a settlor of the trust for services rendered, must be allocated to principal.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Scope and application.

It is difficult to predict how frequently and to what extent trustees will invest directly in derivative financial instruments rather than participating indirectly through investment entities that may utilize these instruments in varying degrees.
If the trust participates in derivatives indirectly through an entity, an amount received from the entity will be allocated under section 3351 and not section 3364.
If a trustee invests directly in derivatives to a significant extent, the expectation is that receipts and disbursements related to derivatives will be accounted for under section 3353; if a trustee chooses not to account under section 3353, subsection 3364(b) provides the default rule. Certain types of option transactions in which trustees may engage are dealt with in subsection (c) to distinguish those transactions from ones involving options that are embedded in derivative financial instruments.

Definition of “derivative”.

“Derivative” is a difficult term to define because new derivatives are invented daily as dealers tailor their terms to achieve specific financial objectives for particular clients.
Since derivatives are typically contract-based, a derivative can probably be devised for almost any set of objectives if another party can be found who is willing to assume the obligations required to meet those objectives.

The most comprehensive definition of derivative is in the Exposure Draft of a Proposed Statement of Financial Accounting Standards titled “Accounting for Derivative and Similar Financial Instruments and for Hedging Activities,” which was released by the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) on June 20, 1996 (No. 162-B).
The definition in subsection 3364(a) is derived in part from the FASB definition.
The purpose of the definition in subsection (a) is to implement the substantive rule in subsection (b) that provides for all receipts and disbursements to be allocated to principal to the extent the trustee elects not to account for transactions in derivatives under section 3353.
As a result, it is much shorter than the FASB definition, which serves much more ambitious objectives.

A derivative is frequently described as including futures, forwards, swaps and options, terms that also require definition, and the definition in this Act avoids these terms.
FASB used the same approach, explaining in paragraph 65 of the Exposure Draft:

The definition of
derivative financial instrument
in this Statement includes those financial instruments generally considered to be derivatives, such as forwards, futures, swaps, options, and similar instruments.
The Board considered defining a derivative financial instrument by merely referencing those commonly understood instruments, similar to paragraph 5 of Statement 119, which says that “. . . a derivative financial instrument is a futures, forward, swap, or option contract, or other financial instrument with similar characteristics.”
However, the continued development of financial markets and innovative financial instruments could ultimately render a definition based on examples inadequate and obsolete.
The Board, therefore, decided to base the definition of a derivative financial instrument on a description of the common characteristics of those instruments in order to accommodate the accounting for newly developed derivatives.
(Footnote omitted.)

Marking to market.

A gain or loss that occurs because the trustee marks securities to market or to another value during an accounting period is not a transaction in a derivative financial instrument that is income or principal under the Act - only cash receipts and disbursements, and the receipt of property in exchange for a principal asset, affect a trust’s principal and income accounts.

Receipt of property other than cash.

If a trustee receives property other than cash upon the settlement of a derivatives transaction, that property would be principal under subdivision 3354(2).

Options.

Options to which subsection (c) applies include an option to purchase real estate owned by the trustee and a put option purchased by a trustee to guard against a drop in value of a large block of marketable stock that must be liquidated to pay estate taxes.
Subsection (c) would also apply to a continuing and regular practice of selling call options on securities owned by the trust if the terms of the option require delivery of the securities.
It does not apply if the consideration received or given for the option is something other than cash or property, such as cross-options granted in a buy-sell agreement between owners of an entity.

§ 3365.
Asset-backed securities.

As used in this section, “asset-backed security” means an asset whose value is based upon the right it gives the owner to receive distributions from the proceeds of financial assets that provide collateral for the security. The term includes an asset that gives the owner the right to receive from the collateral financial assets only the interest or other current return or only the proceeds other than interest or current return. The term does not include an asset to which section 3351 or 3359 of this title applies.

If a trust receives a payment from interest or other current return and from other proceeds of the collateral financial assets, the trustee shall allocate to income the portion of the payment which the payer identifies as being from interest or other current return and shall allocate the balance of the payment to principal.

If a trust receives one or more payments in exchange for the trust’s entire interest in an asset-backed security in one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate the payments to principal. If a payment is one of a series of payments that will result in the liquidation of the trust’s interest in the security over more than one accounting period, the trustee shall allocate 10 percent of the payment to income and the balance to principal.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Scope of section.

Typical asset-backed securities include arrangements in which debt obligations such as real estate mortgages, credit card receivables and auto loans are acquired by an investment trust and interests in the trust are sold to investors.
The source for payments to an investor is the money received from principal and interest payments on the underlying debt.
An asset-backed security includes an “interest only” or a “principal only” security that permits the investor to receive only the interest payments received from the bonds, mortgages or other assets that are the collateral for the asset-backed security, or only the principal payments made on those collateral assets.
An asset-backed security also includes a security that permits the investor to participate in either the capital appreciation of an underlying security or in the interest or dividend return from such a security, such as the “Primes” and “Scores” issued by Americus Trust.
An asset-backed security does not include an interest in a corporation, partnership, or an investment trust described in the comment to section 3352, whose assets consist significantly or entirely of investment assets.
Receipts from an instrument that do not come within the scope of this section or any other section of the Act would be allocated entirely to principal under the rule in subdivision 3323(a)(4), and the trustee may then consider whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust in section 3324, taking into account the return from the portfolio as whole and other relevant factors.